California, session 20252026, SB745.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 51225.34 is added to the Education Code, to read:51225.34. (a) The department shall, in collaboration with, and subject to the approval of, the executive director of the state board, enter into a contract with a county office of education or a consortium of county offices of education for the purpose of developing a curriculum guide for a one-year course in American government and civics.(b) The curriculum guide developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:(1) Fundamentals on the responsibilities of federal departments and agencies.(2) Fundamentals on California state government institutions, including the legislative, executive, and judicial branches, along with state agencies and departments.(3) Fundamentals on local government institutions, including city councils, county boards of supervisors, and other local bodies.(4) Fundamentals on special districts in California, including their purpose and membership.(5) Fundamentals on Tribal tribal governments in California, including their purpose and membership.(6) Fundamentals on direct democracy in California, including ballot initiatives, referenda, and the recall process.(7) How to participate in the decisionmaking of federal, state, local, and special district institutions, including, but not limited to, how to contact representatives, how to attend state and local public meetings, and understanding pathways of influence.(8) The role of advocacy and interest groups in government decisionmaking.(9) All of the following relating to voting:(A) Eligibility for, and requirements relating to, registering to vote.(B) The various methods for registering to vote, including the ability to preregister to vote.(C) Acquiring official, nonpartisan election and voter information from county and state elections officials, including, but not limited to, accessing county and state elections internet websites.(D) Understanding the electoral systems used at the federal, state, and local level.(E) How to complete and submit a ballot through various methods, including vote by mail and in person at a polling place or vote center.(F) An individual’s rights as a voter.(10) Tools for constructive political dialogue, including methods and techniques such as Socratic seminars and structured classroom debates, to teach pupils how to engage in respectful disagreements.(c) This section shall be implemented only upon appropriation by the Legislature for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute.SEC. 2.Section 51473 of the Education Code is amended to read:51473.A school district that participates in the program under this article shall do all of the following:(a)Deem a pupil’s successful completion of a one-year course in American government and civics as satisfying the criteria adopted by the state board that a pupil demonstrates a competent understanding of United States and California constitutions; functions and governance of local governments; tribal government structures and organizations; the role of the citizen in a constitutional democracy; and democratic principles, concepts, and processes. A pupil who successfully completes a one-year course in American government and civics shall still be required to satisfy all other criteria adopted by the state board in order to receive the State Seal of Civic Engagement.(b)Maintain appropriate records in order to identify pupils who have earned a State Seal of Civic Engagement.(c)Affix the appropriate insignia to the diploma or transcript of each pupil who earns a State Seal of Civic Engagement.SEC. 2. Section 51471.5 is added to the Education Code, to read:51471.5. (a) A pupil’s successful completion of a one-year course in American government and civics shall satisfy the criteria adopted by the state board that a pupil demonstrates a competent understanding of United States and California constitutions; functions and governance of local governments; tribal government structures and organizations; the role of the citizen in a constitutional democracy; and democratic principles, concepts, and processes.(b) This section shall not prohibit a school district from deeming a pupil’s successful completion of a one-semester course in American government and civics as contributing to satisfying the criteria adopted by the state board pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 51471.(c) A pupil who successfully completes a one-year course in American government and civics shall still be required to satisfy all other criteria adopted by the state board in order to receive the State Seal of Civic Engagement.